West Virginia, session 2026, SB945.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 1J. THE WEST VIRGINIA MILITARY AUTHORITY ACT. §15-1J-5. Employees. (a) The authority may hire, administer, and manage employees necessary to fulfill its responsibilities.(1) All employees are exempt from both the classified services category and the classified exempt services category as set forth in §29-6-4 of this code.(2) Employee positions are contingent on the receipt of the necessary federal and/or state funds.(3) Each employee hired shall be deemed an at-will employee who may be discharged or released from his or her respective position without cause or reason.(4) Employees will participate in the PEIA, PERS, and workers' compensation and unemployment compensation programs, or their equivalents. Public safety-related positions will continue to require dual status membership as outlined in §15-1B-26 of this code.(b) The Adjutant General shall set appropriate salary rates for employees equivalent to a competitive wage rate necessary to support a specific mission. If there is a federal government shutdown, furlough, or similar action, the Adjutant General may pay any furloughed employees during the period of such shutdown or furlough once federal funds are received for that period. (c) Security guards and military firefighters hired by the authority under the provisions of this article will continue to have the same authority and must meet the requirements as set forth in §15-1B-22 of this code. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home